Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-18] Delivery of offenders to civil
authorities. (a) Under such rules as may be adopted under this chapter, a
person subject to this chapter who is on active state duty or on duty status
other than active state duty who is accused of an offense against civil
authority may be delivered, upon request, to the civil authority for trial.

(b) When delivery under this section is made
to any civil authority of a person undergoing sentence of a court-martial, the
delivery, if followed by conviction in a civil tribunal, interrupts the
execution of the sentence of the court-martial, and the offender after having
answered to the civil authorities for the offender's offense shall, upon the
request of competent military authority, be returned to military custody for
the completion of the offender's sentence. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next